Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB561.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 205 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) The Department for Medicaid Services shall include coverage for adult day
health care services and in-home attendant, or personal care, services in
each 1915(c) waiver program administered by the department that enrolls
adult participants.
(b) Coverage required under this section shall include at least forty (40) hours
per week of adult day health care services, and separately at least forty (40)
hours per week of in-home attendant, or personal care, services.
(c) Coverage limits established in this section shall not provide for a single or
combined coverage limit for the two (2) services or in any way aggregate
coverage limits for adult day health care services and in-home attendant, or
personal care, services.
(2) The Department for Medicaid Services shall, within ninety (90) days after the
effective date of this Act, promulgate administrative regulations in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13A to implement this section.
Section 2. If the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or the Department for
Medicaid Services determines that a state plan amendment, waiver, or any other form of
authorization or approval from any federal agency to implement Section 1 of this Act is
necessary to prevent the loss of federal funds or to comply with federal law, the cabinet
or department:
Page 2 of 3
BR110300.100 - 1103 - XXXX 2/4/2026 2:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1103
(1) Shall, within 90 days after the effective date of this section, request the
necessary federal authorization or approval to implement Section 1 of this Act; and
(2) May only delay implementation of the provisions of Section 1 of this Act for
which federal authorization or approval was deemed necessary until the federal
authorization or approval is granted.
Section 3. Sections 1 and 2 of this Act shall constitute the specific authorization
required under KRS 205.5372(1).
Page 3 of 3
BR110300.100 - 1103 - XXXX 2/4/2026 2:59 PM Jacketed